Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-1028
County canvassing board; appointment.

The election commissioner or county clerk shall appoint two or more registered voters to constitute a county canvassing board. The election commissioner or county clerk shall be a member of the county canvassing board. One registered voter shall be appointed from the political party casting the highest number of votes for Governor or for President of the United States in the county in the immediately preceding general election, and one registered voter shall be appointed from the political party casting the next highest number of votes for such office. The election commissioner or county clerk may appoint additional registered voters to serve on the county canvassing board and may appoint registered voters to serve in case of a vacancy among any of the members of the county canvassing board. Such appointees shall be balanced between the political parties and may include registered voters unaffiliated with any political party.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 322.